Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.061

Elector.

"Elector" means any person who possesses all of the qualifications to vote under Article VI of the state Constitution, including persons who are seventeen years of age at the primary election or presidential primary election but who will be eighteen years of age by the general election.

[ 2020 c 208 s 13; 2003 c 111 s 111. Prior: 1987 c 346 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.01.065.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 3, 5, 6, and 13-17: See note following RCW 29A.08.210.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.